Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202052-1308
Farm product, defined.

Farm product shall mean an agricultural commodity, a species of livestock used or produced in farming operations, or a product of such crop or livestock in its unmanufactured state, that is in the possession of a person engaged in farming operations. Farm products shall include, but are not limited to, apples, artichokes, asparagus, barley, bees, buffalo, bull semen, cantaloupe, carrots, cattle and calves, chickens, corn, cucumbers, dry beans, dry peas and lentils, eggs, embryos or genetic products, emu, fish, flax seed, goats, grapes, hay, hemp, hogs, honey, honeydew melon, horses, llamas, milk, millet, muskmelon, oats, onions, ostrich, popcorn, potatoes, pumpkins, raspberries, rye, safflower, seed crops, sheep and lambs, silage, sorghum grain, soybeans, squash, strawberries, sugar beets, sunflower seeds, sweet corn, tomatoes, trees, triticale, turkeys, vetch, walnuts, watermelon, wheat, and wool. The Secretary of State may, by rule and regulation, add other farm products to the list specified in this section if such products are covered by the general definition provided by this section.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 62;

Laws 2016, LB1035, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB803, § 22;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 46.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB803, section 22, with LB909, section 46, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB803 became effective November 14, 2020. Changes made by LB909 became operative November 14, 2020.